Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.045

Examination.

The secretary may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of licensing authorities. The examination shall determine if the applicant has a thorough knowledge of the principles governing the practice of an ocularist.

[ 1991 c 180 s 5.]